District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.75

Penalty for violations of chapter.

Any person who shall violate any provision of this chapter for which no penalty is otherwise provided shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not more than 90 days, or both.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 139, ch. 222, § 75
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 266(b), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 40-475.
1973 Ed., § 40-491.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 266(b) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.